Florida, session 2026, SB1126.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âSection 287.139, Florida Statutes, is created 18 and incorporated into part I of chapter 287, Florida Statutes, 19 to read: 20 287.139âCertain foreign entities domiciled in the Peopleâs 21 Republic of China; state bidding prohibited.â 22 (1)âFor the purposes of this section, the term âcovered 23 foreign entityâ means: 24 (a)âAn entity that designs, manufactures, assembles, or 25 procures any goods or services needed for an office environment, 26 including, but not limited to, the design, manufacturing, 27 assembly, and procurement of computers, printers, or 28 interoperable videoconferencing services; and 29 (b)âWhose parent company, controlling interest, or 30 substantial shareholder is domiciled in the Peopleâs Republic of 31 China and must comply with the 2015 National Security Law, the 32 2017 National Intelligence Law, or other Chinese law that 33 requires the parent company, controlling interest, or 34 substantial stakeholder to cooperate with the Chinese national 35 defense or national intelligence agencies; or 36 (c)âA Chinese-domiciled company in which the government of 37 China has an ownership stake; or 38 (d)âAn entity or a subsidiary of a parent company included 39 in the United States Department of Homeland Securityâs Uyghur 40 Forced Labor Prevention Act Entity List; or 41 (e)âA subsidiary of an entity or an entity controlled by 42 another entity described in this subsection. 43 (2)âOn or after July 1, 2026, a covered foreign entity is 44 ineligible to, and may not, bid on, submit a proposal for, or 45 enter into or renew a contract, either directly or through a 46 third party, with an agency for goods, services, or the 47 procurement of computers, printers, or interoperable 48 videoconferencing services needed for an office environment. 49 (3)âThe prohibition described in subsection (2) applies to 50 any local agency, local government, or local entity that is a 51 recipient of state funds that may be used for the procurement, 52 purchase, or expenditure of funds for any equipment or services 53 described in subsection (2). 54 (4)âAn entity that submits a bid or proposal pursuant to 55 this section must certify in its bid or proposal that it is not 56 a covered foreign entity. 57 (5)âIf a contracting agency, local government, or local 58 entity described in subsection (3) determines that an entity has 59 submitted a false certification or that an entity is a covered 60 foreign entity, the contracting agency, local government, or 61 local entity must immediately terminate the contract with the 62 entity. 63 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.